Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1407
Employee; provide employer notice
of status as volunteer emergency responder.

Prior to seeking
protection pursuant to the Volunteer Emergency Responders Job Protection Act,
an employee acting as a volunteer emergency responder shall provide his or
her employer with a written statement signed by the individual in charge of
the department
or another individual authorized to act for such individual notifying such
employer that the employee serves as a volunteer emergency responder. An employee
who is or who has served as a volunteer emergency responder shall notify his
or her employer when such employee's status as a volunteer emergency responder
changes, including termination of such status.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1005, § 4.